Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-251
Mobile barber shop; application; review; denial; inspection.

In addition to the requirements of the Barber Act, each application for a license to operate a mobile barber shop shall be reviewed by the board for compliance with the requirements of the Barber Act. If an application is denied, the applicant shall be informed in writing of the grounds for denial, and such denial shall not prejudice future applications by the applicant. If an application is approved, the board shall issue the applicant a certificate of consideration to operate a mobile barber shop pending an operation inspection. The board shall conduct an operation inspection of each barber shop issued a certificate of consideration within six months after the issuance of such certificate. A barber shop which passes the inspection shall be issued a license. A barber shop which fails the inspection shall submit within fifteen days evidence of corrective action taken to improve those aspects of operation found deficient. If evidence is not submitted within fifteen days or if after a second inspection the barber shop does not receive a satisfactory rating, it shall immediately relinquish its certificate of consideration and cease operation.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 86.
January 1, 2019